Missouri, session 2026, SB1633.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 213.010, 213.030, 213.040, 213.045,
213.050, 213.055, 213.065, 213.070, 213.075, 213.101, 213.111,
and 285.575, RSMo, are repealed and eleven new sections enacted
in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 213.010, 213.030,
213.040, 213.045, 213.050, 213.055, 213.065, 213.070, 213.075,
213.101, and 213.111, to read as follows:
213.010. As used in this chapter, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Age", an age of forty or more years but less than
seventy years, except that it shall not be an unlawful
employment practice for an employer to require the
compulsory retirement of any person who has attained the age
of sixty-five and who, for the two-year period immediately
before retirement, is employed in a bona fide executive or
high policy-making position, if such person is entitled to
an immediate nonforfeitable annual retirement benefit from a
pension, profit sharing, savings or deferred compensation
plan, or any combination of such plans, of the employer,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1633 2
which equals, in the aggregate, at least forty-four thousand
dollars;
(2) ["Because" or "because of", as it relates to the
adverse decision or action, the protected criterion was the
motivating factor;
(3)] "Commission", the Missouri commission on human
rights;
[(4)] (3) "Complainant", a person who has filed a
complaint with the commission alleging that another person
has engaged in a prohibited discriminatory practice;
[(5)] (4) "Disability", a physical or mental
impairment which substantially limits one or more of a
person's major life activities, being regarded as having
such an impairment, or a record of having such an
impairment, which with or without reasonable accommodation
does not interfere with performing the job, utilizing the
place of public accommodation, or occupying the dwelling in
question. For purposes of this chapter, the term
"disability" does not include current, illegal use of or
addiction to a controlled substance as such term is defined
by section 195.010; however, a person may be considered to
have a disability if that person:
(a) Has successfully completed a supervised drug
rehabilitation program and is no longer engaging in the
illegal use of, and is not currently addicted to, a
controlled substance or has otherwise been rehabilitated
successfully and is no longer engaging in such use and is
not currently addicted;
(b) Is participating in a supervised rehabilitation
program and is no longer engaging in illegal use of
controlled substances; or

SB 1633 3
(c) Is erroneously regarded as currently illegally
using, or being addicted to, a controlled substance;
[(6)] (5) "Discrimination", [conduct proscribed
herein, taken because of] any unfair treatment on the basis
of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex,
[or] sexual orientation, gender identity, or age, as it
relates to employment, disability, veteran status, or
familial status as it relates to housing. Discrimination
includes any unfair treatment based on a person’s presumed
or assumed race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, as it relates
to employment, disability, veteran status, or familial
status as it relates to housing, regardless of whether the
presumption or assumption as to such characteristic is
correct;
[(7)] (6) "Dwelling", any building, structure or
portion thereof which is occupied as, or designed or
intended for occupancy as, a residence by one or more
families, and any vacant land which is offered for sale or
lease for the construction or location thereon of any such
building, structure or portion thereof;
[(8)] (7) "Employer", [a person engaged in an industry
affecting commerce who has six or more employees for each
working day in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the
current or preceding calendar year, and shall include]
includes the state, or any political or civil subdivision
thereof, or any person employing six or more persons within
the state, and any person directly acting in the interest of
an employer, but does not include corporations and
associations owned [or] and operated by religious or
sectarian [organizations. "Employer" shall not include:
(a) The United States;

SB 1633 4
(b) A corporation wholly owned by the government of
the United States;
(c) An individual employed by an employer;
(d) An Indian tribe;
(e) Any department or agency of the District of
Columbia subject by statute to procedures of the competitive
service, as defined in 5 U.S.C. Section 2101; or
(f) A bona fide private membership club, other than a
labor organization, that is exempt from taxation under 26
U.S.C. Section 501(c)] groups;
[(9)] (8) "Employment agency" includes any person or
agency, public or private, regularly undertaking with or
without compensation to procure employees for an employer or
to procure for employees opportunities to work for an
employer;
[(10)] (9) "Executive director", the executive
director of the Missouri commission on human rights;
[(11)] (10) "Familial status", one or more individuals
who have not attained the age of eighteen years being
domiciled with:
(a) A parent or another person having legal custody of
such individual; or
(b) The designee of such parent or other person having
such custody, with the written permission of such parent or
100 other person. The protections afforded against
101 discrimination [because of] on the basis of familial status
102 shall apply to any person who is pregnant or is in the
103 process of securing legal custody of any individual who has
104 not attained the age of eighteen years;
105 (11) "Gender identity", the gender-related identity,
106 appearance, mannerisms, or other gender-related

SB 1633 5
107 characteristics of an individual, with or without regard to
108 the individual's assigned sex at birth;
109 (12) "Human rights fund", a fund established to
110 receive civil penalties as required by federal regulations
111 and as set forth by subdivision (2) of subsection 11 of
112 section 213.075, and which will be disbursed to offset
113 additional expenses related to compliance with the
114 Department of Housing and Urban Development regulations;
115 (13) "Labor organization" includes any organization
116 which exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of
117 collective bargaining or of dealing with employers
118 concerning grievances, terms or conditions of employment, or
119 for other mutual aid or protection in relation to employment;
120 (14) "Local commissions", any commission or agency
121 established prior to August 13, 1986, by an ordinance or
122 order adopted by the governing body of any city,
123 constitutional charter city, town, village, or county;
124 (15) "Person" includes one or more individuals,
125 corporations, partnerships, associations, organizations,
126 labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual
127 companies, joint stock companies, trusts, trustees, trustees
128 in bankruptcy, receivers, fiduciaries, or other organized
129 groups of persons;
130 (16) "Places of public accommodation", all places or
131 businesses offering or holding out to the general public,
132 goods, services, privileges, facilities, advantages or
133 accommodations for the peace, comfort, health, welfare and
134 safety of the general public or such public places providing
135 food, shelter, recreation and amusement, including, but not
136 limited to:
137 (a) Any inn, hotel, motel, or other establishment
138 which provides lodging to transient guests, other than an

SB 1633 6
139 establishment located within a building which contains not
140 more than five rooms for rent or hire and which is actually
141 occupied by the proprietor of such establishment as [his]
142 the proprietor's residence;
143 (b) Any restaurant, cafeteria, lunchroom, lunch
144 counter, soda fountain, or other facility principally
145 engaged in selling food for consumption on the premises,
146 including, but not limited to, any such facility located on
147 the premises of any retail establishment;
148 (c) Any gasoline station, including all facilities
149 located on the premises of such gasoline station and made
150 available to the patrons thereof;
151 (d) Any motion picture house, theater, concert hall,
152 sports arena, stadium, or other place of exhibition or
153 entertainment;
154 (e) Any public facility owned, operated, or managed by
155 or on behalf of this state or any agency or subdivision
156 thereof, or any public corporation; and any such facility
157 supported in whole or in part by public funds;
158 (f) Any establishment which is physically located
159 within the premises of any establishment otherwise covered
160 by this section or within the premises of which is
161 physically located any such covered establishment, and which
162 holds itself out as serving patrons of such covered
163 establishment;
164 (17) "Race", includes a perception that a person is of
165 a particular racial group based upon:
166 (a) Shared physical traits associated with ancestral
167 origin or ethnicity;
168 (b) Shared cultural attributes;
169 (c) Wearing of protective hairstyles including, but
170 not limited to, hairstyles and coverings that are designed

SB 1633 7
171 to protect textured hair from damage so it may be worn in
172 its natural state such as braids, wigs, locks, twists, and
173 afros; and
174 (d) Similar physical characteristics such as skin
175 color and facial features;
176 [(17)] (18) "Rent" includes to lease, to sublease, to
177 let and otherwise to grant for consideration the right to
178 occupy premises not owned by the occupant;
179 [(18)] (19) "Respondent", a person who is alleged to
180 have engaged in a prohibited discriminatory practice in a
181 complaint filed with the commission;
182 [(19) "The motivating factor", the employee's
183 protected classification actually played a role in the
184 adverse action or decision and had a determinative influence
185 on the adverse decision or action;]
186 (20) "Sexual orientation", one's actual or perceived
187 emotional or physical attraction to, or romantic or physical
188 relationships with, members of the same gender, members of a
189 different gender, or members of any gender; or the lack of
190 any emotional or physical attraction to, or romantic or
191 physical relationships with, anyone. The term "sexual
192 orientation" includes a history of such attraction or
193 relationship or a history of no such attraction or
194 relationship;
195 [(20)] (21) "Unlawful discriminatory practice", any
196 act that is unlawful under this chapter;
197 (22) "Veteran status", means an individual served in a
198 branch of the military of the United States or in the
199 Missouri National Guard and was discharged for any reason
200 other than dishonorable discharge or bad conduct discharge.
213.030. 1. The powers and duties of the commission
shall be:

SB 1633 8
(1) To seek to eliminate and prevent discrimination
[because] on the basis of race, color, religion, national
origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
age, as it relates to employment, disability, veteran
status, or familial status as it relates to housing and to
take other actions against discrimination [because] on the
basis of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability,
veteran status, or familial status as provided by law; and
the commission is hereby given general jurisdiction and
power for such purposes;
(2) To implement the purposes of this chapter first by
conference, conciliation and persuasion so that persons may
be guaranteed their civil rights and goodwill be fostered;
(3) To formulate policies to implement the purposes of
this chapter and to make recommendations to agencies and
officers of the state and political subdivisions in aid of
such policies and purposes;
(4) To appoint such employees as it may deem
necessary, fix their compensation within the appropriations
provided and in accordance with the wage structure
established for other state agencies, and prescribe their
duties;
(5) To obtain upon request and utilize the services of
all governmental departments and agencies to be paid from
appropriations to this commission;
(6) To adopt, promulgate, amend, and rescind suitable
rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this
chapter and the policies and practices of the commission in
connection therewith;
(7) To receive, investigate, initiate, and pass upon
complaints alleging discrimination in employment, housing or

SB 1633 9
in places of public accommodations [because] on the basis of
race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity, age, as it relates to
employment, disability, veteran status, or familial status
as it relates to housing and to require the production for
examination of any books, papers, records, or other
materials relating to any matter under investigation;
(8) To hold hearings, subpoena witnesses, compel their
attendance, administer oaths, to take the testimony of any
person under oath, and, in connection therewith, to require
the production for examination of any books, papers or other
materials relating to any matter under investigation or in
question before the commission;
(9) To issue publications and the results of studies
and research which will tend to promote goodwill and
minimize or eliminate discrimination in housing, employment
or in places of public accommodation [because] on the basis
of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity, age, as it relates to
employment, disability, veteran status, or familial status
as it relates to housing;
(10) To provide each year to the governor and to the
general assembly a full written report of all its activities
and of its recommendations;
(11) To adopt an official seal;
(12) To cooperate, act jointly, enter into cooperative
or work-sharing agreements with the United States Equal
Employment Opportunity Commission, the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development, and other
federal agencies and local commissions or agencies to
achieve the purposes of this chapter;

SB 1633 10
(13) To accept grants, private gifts, bequests, and
establish funds to dispose of such moneys so long as the
conditions of the grant, gift, or bequest are not
inconsistent with the purposes of this chapter and are used
to achieve the purposes of this chapter;
(14) To establish a human rights fund as defined in
section 213.010, for the purposes of administering sections
213.040, 213.045, 213.050, 213.070, 213.075, and 213.076.
2. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated under the
authority of this chapter shall become effective unless it
has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of [section
536.024] chapter 536.
213.040. 1. It shall be an unlawful housing practice:
(1) To refuse to sell or rent after the making of a
bona fide offer, to refuse to negotiate for the sale or
rental of, to deny or otherwise make unavailable, a dwelling
to any person [because] on the basis of race, color,
religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran status, or
familial status;
(2) To discriminate against any person in the terms,
conditions, or privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling,
or in the provision of services or facilities in connection
therewith, [because] on the basis of race, color, religion,
national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, disability, veteran status, or familial status;
(3) To make, print, or publish, or cause to be made,
printed, or published any notice, statement or
advertisement, with respect to the sale or rental of a
dwelling that indicates any preference, limitation, or
discrimination [because] on the basis of race, color,
religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual

SB 1633 11
orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran status, or
familial status, or an intention to make any such
preference, limitation, or discrimination;
(4) To represent to any person [because] on the basis
of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran
status, or familial status that any dwelling is not
available for inspection, sale, or rental when such dwelling
is in fact so available;
(5) To induce or attempt to induce any person to sell
or rent any dwelling by representations regarding the entry
or prospective entry into the neighborhood of a person or
persons [because] on the basis of a particular race, color,
religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran status, or
familial status;
(6) To discriminate in the sale or rental of, or to
otherwise make unavailable or deny, a dwelling to any buyer
or renter [because] on the basis of a disability of:
(a) That buyer or renter;
(b) A person residing in or intending to reside in
that dwelling after it is so sold, rented, or made
available; or
(c) Any person associated with that buyer or renter;
(7) To discriminate against any person in the terms,
conditions, or privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling,
or in the provision of services or facilities in connection
with such dwelling, [because] on the basis of a disability
of:
(a) That person;

SB 1633 12
(b) A person residing in or intending to reside in
that dwelling after it is so sold, rented, or made
available; or
(c) Any person associated with that person.
2. For purposes of this section and sections 213.045
and 213.050, discrimination includes:
(1) A refusal to permit, at the expense of the person
with the disability, reasonable modifications of existing
premises occupied or to be occupied by such person if such
modifications may be necessary to afford such person full
enjoyment of the premises, except that, in the case of a
rental, the landlord may, where it is reasonable to do so,
condition permission for a modification on the renter's
agreeing to restore the interior of the premises to the
condition that existed before the modification, reasonable
wear and tear excepted;
(2) A refusal to make reasonable accommodations in
rules, policies, practices, or services, when such
accommodations may be necessary to afford such person equal
opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or
(3) In connection with the design and construction of
covered multifamily dwellings for first occupancy after
March 13, 1991, a failure to design and construct those
dwellings in such a manner that:
(a) The public use and common use portions of such
dwellings are readily accessible to and usable by persons
with a disability;
(b) All the doors designed to allow passage into and
within all premises within such dwellings are sufficiently
wide to allow passage by persons with a disability in
wheelchairs; and

SB 1633 13
(c) All premises within such dwellings contain the
following features of adaptive design:
a. An accessible route into and through the dwelling;
b. Light switches, electrical outlets, thermostats,
and other environmental controls in accessible locations;
c. Reinforcements in bathroom walls to allow later
installation of grab bars; and
d. Usable kitchens and bathrooms such that an
individual in a wheelchair can maneuver about the space.
3. As used in subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this
section, the term "covered multifamily dwelling" means:
(1) Buildings consisting of four or more units if such
buildings have one or more elevators; and
(2) Ground floor units in other buildings consisting
of four or more units.
4. Compliance with the appropriate requirements of the
American National Standard for Buildings and Facilities
providing accessibility and usability for people with
100 physical disabilities, commonly cited as "ANSI A117.1",
101 suffices to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (a) of
102 subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section.
103 5. Where a unit of general local government has
104 incorporated into its laws the requirements set forth in
105 subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section, compliance
106 with such laws shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements
107 of that subdivision. Such compliance shall be subject to
108 the following provisions:
109 (1) A unit of general local government may review and
110 approve newly constructed covered multifamily dwellings for
111 the purpose of making determinations as to whether the
112 design and construction requirements of subdivision (3) of
113 subsection 2 of this section are met;

SB 1633 14
114 (2) The commission shall encourage, but may not
115 require, the units of local government to include in their
116 existing procedures for the review and approval of newly
117 constructed covered multifamily dwellings, determinations as
118 to whether the design and construction of such dwellings are
119 consistent with subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this
120 section, and shall provide technical assistance to units of
121 local government and other persons to implement the
122 requirements of subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this
123 section;
124 (3) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
125 require the commission to review or approve the plans,
126 designs or construction of all covered dwellings, to
127 determine whether the design and construction of such
128 dwellings are consistent with the requirements of
129 subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section.
130 6. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
131 invalidate or limit any law of the state or political
132 subdivision of the state, or other jurisdiction in which
133 this chapter shall be effective, that requires dwellings to
134 be designed and constructed in a manner that affords persons
135 with disabilities greater access than is required by this
136 chapter.
137 7. Nothing in this section and sections 213.045 and
138 213.050 requires that a dwelling be made available to an
139 individual whose tenancy would constitute a direct threat to
140 the health or safety of other individuals or whose tenancy
141 would result in substantial physical damage to the property
142 of others.
143 8. Nothing in this section and sections 213.045 and
144 213.050 limits the applicability of any reasonable local or
145 state restriction regarding the maximum number of occupants

SB 1633 15
146 permitted to occupy a dwelling, nor does any provision in
147 this section and sections 213.045 and 213.050 regarding
148 familial status apply with respect to housing for older
149 persons.
150 9. As used in this section and sections 213.045 and
151 213.050, "housing for older persons" means housing:
152 (1) Provided under any state or federal program that
153 the commission determines is specifically designed and
154 operated to assist elderly persons, as defined in the state
155 or federal program;
156 (2) Intended for, and solely occupied by, persons
157 sixty-two years of age or older; or
158 (3) Intended and operated for occupancy by at least
159 one person fifty-five years of age or older per unit. In
160 determining whether housing qualifies as housing for older
161 persons under this subsection, the commission shall develop
162 regulations which require at least the following factors:
163 (a) The existence of significant facilities and
164 services specifically designed to meet the physical or
165 social needs of older persons, or if the provision of such
166 facilities and services is not practicable, that such
167 housing is necessary to provide important housing
168 opportunities for older persons; and
169 (b) That at least eighty percent of the units are
170 occupied by at least one person fifty-five years of age or
171 older per unit; and
172 (c) The publication of, and adherence to, policies and
173 procedures which demonstrate an intent by the owner or
174 manager to provide housing for persons fifty-five years of
175 age or older.
176 10. Housing shall not fail to meet the requirements
177 for housing for older persons by reason of:

SB 1633 16
178 (1) Persons residing in such housing as of August 28,
179 1992, who do not meet the age requirements of subdivision
180 (2) or (3) of subsection 9 of this section, provided that
181 new occupants of such housing meet the age requirements of
182 subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection 9 of this section; or
183 (2) Unoccupied units, provided that such units are
184 reserved for occupancy by persons who meet the age
185 requirements of subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection 9 of
186 this section.
187 11. Nothing in this section or section 213.045 or
188 213.050 shall prohibit conduct against a person because such
189 person has been convicted by any court of competent
190 jurisdiction of the illegal manufacture or distribution of a
191 controlled substance, as defined by section 195.010.
192 12. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a religious
193 organization, association, or society, or any nonprofit
194 institution or organization operated, supervised or
195 controlled by or in conjunction with a religious
196 organization, association, or society, from limiting the
197 sale, rental or occupancy of dwellings which it owns or
198 operates for other than a commercial purpose to persons of
199 the same religion, or from giving preference to such
200 persons, unless membership in such religion is restricted on
201 account of race, color, or national origin. Nor shall
202 anything in this chapter prohibit a private club not in fact
203 open to the public, which as an incident to its primary
204 purpose or purposes provides lodging which it owns or
205 operates for other than a commercial purpose, from limiting
206 the rental or occupancy of such lodging to its members or
207 from giving preference to its members.
208 13. Nothing in this chapter, other than the
209 prohibitions against discriminatory advertising in

SB 1633 17
210 subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of this section, shall apply
211 to:
212 (1) The sale or rental of any single family house by a
213 private individual owner, provided the following conditions
214 are met:
215 (a) The private individual owner does not own or have
216 any interest in more than three single family houses at any
217 one time; and
218 (b) The house is sold or rented without the use of a
219 real estate broker, agent or salesperson or the facilities
220 of any person in the business of selling or renting
221 dwellings and without publication, posting or mailing of any
222 advertisement. If the owner selling the house does not
223 reside in it at the time of the sale or was not the most
224 recent resident of the house prior to such sale, the
225 exemption in this section applies to only one such sale in
226 any twenty-four-month period; or
227 (2) Rooms or units in dwellings containing living
228 quarters occupied or intended to be occupied by no more than
229 four families living independently of each other, if the
230 owner actually maintains and occupies one of such living
231 quarters as his or her residence.
213.045. It shall be unlawful for any bank, building
and loan association, insurance company or other
corporation, association, firm or enterprise whose business
consists in whole or in part in the making of commercial
real estate loans, to deny a loan or other financial
assistance [because] on the basis of race, color, religion,
national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, disability, veteran status, or familial status to
a person applying therefor for the purpose of purchasing,
construction, improving, repairing, or maintaining a

SB 1633 18
dwelling, or to discriminate against [him] such person in
fixing of the amount, interest rate, duration or other terms
or conditions of such loan or other financial assistance,
[because] on the basis of the race, color, religion,
national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, disability, veteran status, or familial status of
such person or of any person associated with [him] such
person in connection with such loan or other financial
assistance, or of the present or prospective owners,
lessees, tenants, or occupants, of the dwellings in relation
to which such loan or other financial assistance is to be
made or given.
213.050. It shall be unlawful to deny any person
access to or membership or participation in any multiple
listing service, real estate brokers' organization or other
service organization, or facility relating to the business
of selling or renting dwellings, [because] on the basis of
race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran
status, or familial status.
213.055. 1. It shall be an unlawful employment
practice:
(1) For an employer, [because] on the basis of the
race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age [or],
disability, or veteran status of any individual:
(a) To fail or refuse to hire or to discharge any
individual, or otherwise to discriminate against any
individual with respect to [his] such individual's
compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of
employment, [because] on the basis of such individual's
race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual

SB 1633 19
orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age [or],
disability, or veteran status;
(b) To limit, segregate, or classify [his] employees
or [his] employment applicants in any way which would
deprive or tend to deprive any individual of employment
opportunities or otherwise adversely affect [his] such
individual's status as an employee, [because] on the basis
of such individual's race, color, religion, national origin,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age
[or], disability, or veteran status;
(2) For a labor organization to exclude or to expel
from its membership any individual or to discriminate in any
way against any of its members or against any employer or
any individual employed by an employer [because] on the
basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age [or],
disability, or veteran status of any individual; or to
limit, segregate, or classify its membership, or to classify
or fail or refuse to refer for employment any individual, in
any way which would deprive or tend to deprive any
individual of employment opportunities, or would limit such
employment opportunities or otherwise adversely affect [his]
such individual's status as an employee or as an applicant
for employment, [because] on the basis of such individual's
race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age [or],
disability, or veteran status; or for any employer, labor
organization, or joint labor-management committee
controlling apprenticeship or other training or retraining,
including on-the-job training programs to discriminate
against any individual [because] on the basis of [his] such
individual's race, color, religion, national origin, sex,

SB 1633 20
sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age [or],
disability, or veteran status in admission to, or employment
in, any program established to provide apprenticeship or
other training;
(3) For any employer or employment agency to print or
circulate or cause to be printed or circulated any
statement, advertisement or publication, or to use any form
of application for employment or to make any inquiry in
connection with prospective employment, which expresses,
directly or indirectly, any limitation, specification, or
discrimination, [because] on the basis of race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, ancestry, age [or], disability, or veteran status
unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification or
for an employment agency to fail or refuse to refer for
employment, or otherwise to discriminate against, any
individual [because] on the basis of his or her race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, ancestry, age, as it relates to employment, [or]
disability, or veteran status, or to classify or refer for
employment any individual [because] on the basis of [his or
her] such individual's race, color, religion, national
origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry,
age [or], disability, or veteran status.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter, it shall not be an unlawful employment practice for
an employer to apply different standards of compensation, or
different terms, conditions or privileges of employment
pursuant to a bona fide seniority or merit system, or a
system which measures earnings by quantity or quality of
production or to employees who work in different locations,
provided that such differences or such systems are not the

SB 1633 21
result of an intention or a design to discriminate, and are
not used to discriminate, [because] on the basis of race,
color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
national origin, ancestry, age [or], disability, or veteran
status, nor shall it be an unlawful employment practice for
an employer to give and to act upon the results of any
professionally developed ability test, provided that such
test, its administration, or action upon the results
thereof, is not designed, intended or used to discriminate
[because] on the basis of race, color, religion, national
origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry,
age [or], disability, or veteran status.
3. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be
interpreted to require any employer, employment agency,
labor organization, or joint labor-management committee
subject to this chapter to grant preferential treatment to
any individual or to any group [because] on the basis of the
race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age [or],
disability, or veteran status of such individual or group on
account of an imbalance which may exist with respect to the
total number or percentage of persons of any race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender
100 identity, ancestry, age [or], disability, or veteran status
101 employed by any employer, referred or classified for
102 employment by any employment agency or labor organization,
103 admitted to membership or classified by any labor
104 organization, or admitted to or employed in any
105 apprenticeship or other training program, in comparison with
106 the total number or percentage of persons of such race,
107 color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation,
108 gender identity, ancestry, age [or], disability, or veteran

SB 1633 22
109 status in any community, state, section, or other area, or
110 in the available workforce in any community, state, section,
111 or other area.
112 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
113 chapter, it shall not be an unlawful employment practice for
114 the state or any political subdivision of the state to
115 comply with the provisions of 29 U.S.C. Section 623 relating
116 to employment as firefighters or law enforcement officers.
213.065. 1. All persons within the jurisdiction of
the state of Missouri are free and equal and shall be
entitled to the full and equal use and enjoyment within this
state of any place of public accommodation, as hereinafter
defined, without discrimination or segregation [because] on
the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, [or]
disability, or veteran status.
2. It is an unlawful discriminatory practice for any
person, directly or indirectly, to refuse, withhold from or
deny any other person, or to attempt to refuse, withhold
from or deny any other person, any of the accommodations,
advantages, facilities, services, or privileges made
available in any place of public accommodation, as defined
in section 213.010 and this section, or to segregate or
discriminate against any such person in the use thereof
[because] on the basis of race, color, religion, national
origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry,
[or] disability, or veteran status.
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a
private club, a place of accommodation owned by or operated
on behalf of a religious corporation, association or
society, or other establishment which is not in fact open to
the public, unless the facilities of such establishments are

SB 1633 23
made available to the customers or patrons of a place of
public accommodation as defined in section 213.010 and this
section.
213.070. [1.] It shall be an unlawful discriminatory
practice [for an employer, employment agency, labor
organization, or place of public accommodation]:
(1) To aid, abet, incite, compel, or coerce the
commission of acts prohibited under this chapter or to
attempt to do so;
(2) To retaliate or discriminate in any manner against
any other person because such person has opposed any
practice prohibited by this chapter or because such person
has filed a complaint, testified, assisted, or participated
in any manner in any investigation, proceeding or hearing
conducted pursuant to this chapter;
(3) For the state or any political subdivision of this
state to discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion,
national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
ancestry, age, as it relates to employment, disability,
veteran status, or familial status as it relates to housing;
or
(4) To discriminate in any manner against any other
person because of such person's association with any person
protected by this chapter.
[2. This chapter, in addition to chapter 285 and
chapter 287, shall provide the exclusive remedy for any and
all claims for injury or damages arising out of an
employment relationship.]
213.075. 1. [As a jurisdictional condition precedent
to filing a civil action under this chapter,] Any person
claiming to be aggrieved by an unlawful discriminatory
practice [shall] may make, sign and file with the commission

SB 1633 24
a verified complaint in writing, within one hundred eighty
days of the alleged act of discrimination, which shall state
the name and address of the [employer, employment agency,
labor organization, or place of public accommodation]
alleged to have committed the unlawful discriminatory
practice and which shall set forth the particulars thereof
and such other information as may be required by the
commission. The complainant's agent, attorney or the
attorney general may, in like manner, make, sign and file
such complaint. [The failure to timely file a complaint
with the commission shall deprive the commission of
jurisdiction to investigate the complaint. The commission
shall make a determination as to its jurisdiction with
respect to all complaints. Notwithstanding any other
provision of this chapter to the contrary, if a complaint is
not filed with the commission within one hundred eighty days
of the alleged act of discrimination, the commission shall
lack jurisdiction to take any action on such a complaint
other than to dismiss the complaint for lack of
jurisdiction. The failure to timely file a complaint with
the commission may be raised as a complete defense by a
respondent or defendant at any time, either during the
administrative proceedings before the commission, or in
subsequent litigation, regardless of whether the commission
has issued the person claiming to be aggrieved a letter
indicating his or her right to bring a civil action and
regardless of whether the employer asserted the defense
before the commission.]
2. Any complaint which is filed with the federal Equal
Employment Opportunity Commission or other federal agencies
with which the commission has a work-sharing or deferral
agreement, or with a local commission which has been

SB 1633 25
certified as substantially equivalent by the commission,
shall be deemed filed with the commission on the date that
such complaint is received by such federal agency or local
commission. A copy of all complaints filed with a local
commission with the authority to enforce the provisions of
this chapter is to be forwarded to the commission within
seven days of the filing thereof with such local
commission. If a local commission has jurisdiction to hear
a complaint filed with the commission, such complaint shall
be deemed to have been filed with the local commission on
the date on which such complaint was filed with the
commission. The commission shall, within seven days of the
receipt of a complaint which a local commission has
jurisdiction to hear, forward a copy thereof to such local
commission.
3. After the filing of any complaint, the executive
director shall, with the assistance of the commission's
staff, promptly investigate the complaint, and if the
director determines after the investigation that probable
cause exists for crediting the allegations of the complaint,
the executive director shall immediately endeavor to
eliminate the unlawful discriminatory practice complained of
by conference, conciliation and persuasion, and shall report
the results to the commission. The investigation,
determination of probable cause and conciliation shall be
conducted according to such rules, regulations and
guidelines as the commission shall prescribe.
4. A person who is not named as a respondent in a
complaint, but who is identified as a respondent in the
course of investigation, may be joined as an additional or
substitute respondent upon written notice, pursuant to such
rules, regulations, and guidelines as the commission shall

SB 1633 26
prescribe. Such notice, in addition to complying with the
requirements of such rules, regulations, and guidelines,
shall also state the reason why the person to whom the
notice is addressed has been joined as a party.
5. In case of failure to eliminate such discriminatory
practice as found in the investigation, if in the judgment
of the chairperson of the commission circumstances so
warrant, there shall be issued and served in the name of the
commission, a written notice, together with a copy of the
complaint, as it may have been amended, requiring the person
named in the complaint, hereinafter referred to as
"respondent", to answer the charges of the complaint at a
hearing, at a time and place to be specified in the notice,
before a panel of at least three members of the commission
sitting as the commission or before a hearing examiner
licensed to practice law in this state who shall be
appointed by the executive director and approved by the
commission. The place of the hearing shall be in the office
of the commission or such other place designated by it,
except that if the respondent so requests, in writing, the
hearing shall be held in the county of such person's
residence or business location at the time of the alleged
unlawful discriminatory practice. A copy of the notice
shall also be served on the complainants.
6. In all cases where a written notice of hearing has
been issued and a party has not elected the option to
proceed in circuit court as set forth in section 213.076,
the procedures set forth for a hearing shall apply.
7. The commission shall be a party to the action and
shall be represented before the panel or the hearing
examiner by the office of the attorney general or, when so
100 delegated by the attorney general, a staff attorney of the

SB 1633 27
101 commission. Neither the hearing examiner nor any member of
102 the panel shall have participated in the investigation of
103 the complaint. Evidence concerning endeavors at
104 conciliation shall be excluded.
105 8. The respondent may file a written verified answer
106 to the complaint and appear at the hearing in person or
107 otherwise with or without counsel, and submit testimony. At
108 the discretion of the hearing examiner or the panel, the
109 complainant may be allowed to intervene, thereby becoming a
110 party to the action with the right to present testimony in
111 person or by counsel, provided the complainant at all times
112 shall be treated as a party for the purpose of discovery and
113 the taking of depositions. The commission or complainant
114 intervenor shall have the power to reasonably and fairly
115 amend any complaint, and the respondent shall have like
116 power to amend any answer. The testimony taken at the
117 hearing shall be under oath and be transcribed.
118 9. In any contested case before the commission, any
119 party may take and use written interrogatories, requests for
120 production of documents and other materials, and requests
121 for admissions, and all other forms of discovery authorized
122 by rules of civil procedure in the same manner, upon, and
123 under the same conditions, and upon the same notice, as is
124 or may hereafter be provided for with respect to the taking
125 and using of written interrogatories, requests for
126 production of documents and other materials, and requests
127 for admissions, and all other forms of discovery authorized
128 by rules of civil procedure in civil actions in the circuit
129 court. The panel or hearing examiner shall have the
130 authority to impose sanctions in the same manner as set
131 forth in the rules of civil procedure.

SB 1633 28
132 10. The hearing shall be conducted in the manner
133 provided by chapter 536.
134 11. When the case is heard by a panel of the
135 commission, the chairperson of the commission shall select
136 the hearing panel and the presiding officer. The presiding
137 officer shall have full authority to call and examine
138 witnesses, admit or exclude evidence and rule upon all
139 motions and objections. The panel shall state its findings
140 of fact and conclusions of law, and if, upon all the
141 evidence at the hearing, the panel finds:
142 (1) That a respondent has engaged in an unlawful
143 discriminatory practice as defined in this chapter, the
144 commission shall issue and cause to be served on the
145 respondent an order requiring the respondent to cease and
146 desist from the unlawful discriminatory practice. The order
147 shall require the respondent to take such affirmative
148 action, as in the panel's judgment will implement the
149 purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to,
150 payment of back pay; hiring; reinstatement or upgrading;
151 restoration to membership in any respondent labor
152 organization; the extension of full, equal and unsegregated
153 housing; the extension of full, equal and unsegregated
154 public accommodations; extension of a commercial real estate
155 loan or other financial assistance; extension or restoration
156 of membership or participation in any multiple listing
157 service or other real estate service organization or
158 facility; payment of actual damages; and the submission of a
159 report of the manner of compliance;
160 (2) That a respondent has engaged or is about to
161 engage in a violation of section 213.040, 213.045, 213.050,
162 or 213.070, to the extent that the alleged violation of
163 section 213.070 relates to or involves a violation of one or

SB 1633 29
164 more of such other sections or relates to or involves the
165 encouraging, aiding, or abetting of a violation of such
166 other sections, the commission may, in addition to the
167 relief provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection,
168 assess a civil penalty against the respondent, for purposes
169 of vindicating the public interest:
170 (a) In an amount not exceeding two thousand dollars if
171 the respondent has not been adjudged to have violated one or
172 more of the sections enumerated in subdivision (2) of this
173 subsection within five years of the date of the filing of
174 the complaint;
175 (b) In an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars
176 if the respondent has been adjudged to have committed one
177 violation of the sections enumerated in subdivision (2) of
178 this subsection within five years of the date on which the
179 complaint is filed;
180 (c) In an amount not exceeding ten thousand dollars if
181 the respondent has been adjudged to have committed two or
182 more prior violations of the sections enumerated in
183 subdivision (2) of this subsection within seven years of the
184 date on which the complaint is filed.
185 All civil penalties set forth in this subsection shall be
186 paid to the human rights fund.
187 12. If, upon all the evidence, the panel finds that a
188 respondent has not engaged in any unlawful discriminatory
189 practice, the panel shall state its findings of fact and
190 conclusions of law and shall issue and cause to be served on
191 the complainant and respondent an order dismissing the
192 complaint.
193 13. When the case is heard by a hearing examiner, the
194 examiner shall have all powers described in subdivision (8)

SB 1633 30
195 of section 213.030 and subsection 11 of this section, for
196 the purpose of the hearing. The hearing examiner shall make
197 findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall recommend
198 to the commission an order granting such relief as provided
199 in subsection 11 of this section or dismissing the complaint
200 as to the respondent as provided in subsection 12 of this
201 section, in accordance with such findings.
202 14. A panel of at least three members of the
203 commission, sitting as the commission, shall review the
204 record, findings and recommended order of the hearing
205 examiner. The panel shall thereafter accept or amend the
206 recommended order which shall become the order of the
207 commission. All orders shall be served on the complainant
208 and respondent, and copies shall be delivered to the
209 attorney general and such other public officers as the
210 commission deems proper.
211 15. No order of the commission issued pursuant to this
212 section shall affect any contract, sale, encumbrance or
213 lease consummated before the issuance of such order and
214 involving a bona fide purchaser without actual notice of the
215 charge filed pursuant to this section.
216 16. Any person aggrieved by an order of the commission
217 may appeal as provided in chapter 536.
213.101. [1.] The provisions of this chapter shall be
construed to accomplish the purposes thereof and any law
inconsistent with any provision of this chapter shall not
apply. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed to
repeal any of the provisions of any law of this state
relating to discrimination [because] on the basis of race,
color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, ancestry, age, disability, veteran status,
or familial status.

SB 1633 31
[2. The general assembly hereby expressly abrogates
the case of McBryde v. Ritenour School District, 207 S.W.3d
162 (Mo.App. E.D. 2006), and its progeny as it relates to
the necessity and appropriateness of the issuance of a
business judgment instruction. In all civil actions brought
under this chapter, a jury shall be given an instruction
expressing the business judgment rule.
3. If an employer in a case brought under this chapter
files a motion pursuant to rule 74.04 of the Missouri rules
of civil procedure, the court shall consider the burden-
shifting analysis of McDonnell Douglas Corp. v. Green, 411
U.S. 792 (1973), and its progeny to be highly persuasive for
analysis in cases not involving direct evidence of
discrimination.
4. The general assembly hereby expressly abrogates by
this statute the cases of Daugherty v. City of Maryland
Heights, 231 S.W.3d 814 (Mo. 2007) and its progeny as they
relate to the contributing factor standard and abandonment
of the burden-shifting framework established in McDonnell
Douglas Corp. v. Green, 411 U.S. 792 (1973).
5. The general assembly hereby expressly abrogates by
this statute the holding in Hurst v. Kansas City Mo. School
District, 437 S.W.3d 327 (Mo.App. W.D. 2014), that Missouri
Approved Instruction 19.01 may be applied to actions brought
pursuant to this chapter, and the holding in Thomas v.
McKeever's Enterprises, Inc., 388 S.W.3d 206 (Mo.App. W.D.
2012), that juries shall not be instructed that plaintiffs
bear the burden of establishing "but for" causation in
actions brought pursuant to this chapter.
6. The general assembly hereby abrogates all Missouri-
approved jury instructions specifically addressing civil

SB 1633 32
actions brought under this chapter which were in effect
prior to August 28, 2017.]
213.111. 1. If, after one hundred eighty days from
the filing of a complaint alleging an unlawful
discriminatory practice pursuant to section 213.055, 213.065
or 213.070 to the extent that the alleged violation of
section 213.070 relates to or involves a violation of
section 213.055 or 213.065, or subdivision (3) of subsection
1 of section 213.070 as it relates to employment and public
accommodations, the commission has not completed its
administrative processing and the person aggrieved so
requests in writing, the commission shall issue to the
person claiming to be aggrieved a letter indicating his or
her right to bring a civil action within ninety days of such
notice against the respondent named in the complaint. [If,
after the filing of a complaint] Any person alleging an
unlawful discriminatory practice pursuant to sections
213.040, 213.045, 213.050 and 213.070, to the extent that
the alleged violation of section 213.070 relates to or
involves a violation of sections 213.040, 213.045 and
213.050, or subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section
213.070 as it relates to housing, [and the person aggrieved
so requests in writing, the commission shall issue to the
person claiming to be aggrieved a letter indicating his or
her right to bring a civil action within ninety days of such
notice against the respondent named in the complaint. The
commission may not at any other time or for any other reason
issue a letter indicating a complainant's right to bring a
civil action] may file a petition in the circuit court of
the county in which the alleged unlawful discriminatory
practice occurred without first filing a complaint with the
commission. Such an action may be brought in any circuit

SB 1633 33
court in any county in which the unlawful discriminatory
practice is alleged to have [been committed] occurred,
either before a circuit or associate circuit judge. Upon
issuance of this notice, the commission shall terminate all
proceedings relating to the complaint. No person may file
or reinstate a complaint with the commission after the
issuance of a notice under this section relating to the same
practice or act. Any action brought in court under this
section shall be filed within ninety days from the date of
the commission's notification letter to the individual but
no later than two years after the alleged cause occurred or
its reasonable discovery by the alleged injured party.
2. The court may grant as relief, as it deems
appropriate, any permanent or temporary injunction,
temporary restraining order, or other order, and may award
to the plaintiff actual and punitive damages, and may award
court costs and reasonable attorney fees to the prevailing
party, other than a state agency or commission or a local
commission; except that, a prevailing respondent may be
awarded court costs and reasonable attorney fees only upon a
showing that the case was without foundation.
[3. Any party to any action initiated under this
section has a right to a trial by jury.
4. The sum of the amount of actual damages, including
damages for future pecuniary losses, emotional pain,
suffering, inconvenience, mental anguish, loss of enjoyment
of life, and other nonpecuniary losses, and punitive damages
awarded under this section shall not exceed for each
complaining party:
(1) Actual back pay and interest on back pay; and
(2) (a) In the case of a respondent who has more than
five and fewer than one hundred one employees in each of

SB 1633 34
twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, fifty thousand dollars;
(b) In the case of a respondent who has more than one
hundred and fewer than two hundred one employees in each of
twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, one hundred thousand dollars;
(c) In the case of a respondent who has more than two
hundred and fewer than five hundred one employees in each of
twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, two hundred thousand dollars; or
(d) In the case of a respondent who has more than five
hundred employees in each of twenty or more calendar weeks
in the current or preceding calendar year, five hundred
thousand dollars.
5. In any employment-related civil action brought
under this chapter, the plaintiff shall bear the burden of
proving the alleged unlawful decision or action was made or
taken because of his or her protected classification and was
the direct proximate cause of the claimed damages.]
[285.575. 1. This section shall be known
and may be cited as the "Whistleblower's
Protection Act".
2. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Because" or "because of", as it
relates to the adverse decision or action, the
person's status as a protected person was the
motivating factor;
(2) "Employer", an entity that has six or
more employees for each working day in each of
twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or
preceding calendar year. "Employer" shall not
include the state of Missouri or its agencies,
instrumentalities, or political subdivisions,
including but not limited to any public
institution of higher education, a corporation

SB 1633 35
wholly owned by the state of Missouri, an
individual employed by an employer, or
corporations and associations owned or operated
by religious or sectarian organizations;
(3) "Proper authorities", a governmental
or law enforcement agency, an officer of an
employee's employer, the employee's supervisor
employed by the employer, or the employee's
human resources representative employed by the
employer;
(4) "Protected person", an employee of an
employer who has reported to the proper
authorities an unlawful act of his or her
employer; an employee of an employer who reports
to his or her employer serious misconduct of the
employer that violates a clear mandate of public
policy as articulated in a constitutional
provision, statute, or regulation promulgated
under statute; or an employee of an employer who
has refused to carry out a directive issued by
his or her employer that if completed would be a
violation of the law. An employee of an
employer is not a protected person if:
(a) The employee is a supervisory,
managerial, or executive employee or an officer
of his or her employer and the unlawful act or
serious misconduct reported concerns matters
upon which the employee is employed to report or
provide professional opinion; or
(b) The proper authority or person to whom
the employee makes his or her report is the
person whom the employee claims to have
committed the unlawful act or violation of a
clear mandate of public policy;
(5) "The motivating factor", the
employee's protected classification actually
played a role in the adverse decision or action
and had a determinative influence on the adverse
decision or action.
3. This section is intended to codify the
existing common law exceptions to the at-will
employment doctrine and to limit their future
expansion by the courts. This section, in
addition to chapter 213 and chapter 287, shall

SB 1633 36
provide the exclusive remedy for any and all
claims of unlawful employment practices.
4. It shall be an unlawful employment
practice for an employer to discharge an
individual defined as a protected person in this
section because of that person's status as a
protected person.
5. A protected person aggrieved by a
violation of this section shall have a private
right of action for actual damages for
violations of this section but not for punitive
damages. However, if a private right of action
for damages exists under another statutory or
regulatory scheme, whether under state or
federal law, no private right of action shall
exist under this statute.
6. Any party to any action initiated under
this section may demand a trial by jury.
7. A protected person aggrieved by a
violation of this section shall have a private
right of action that may be filed in a court of
competent jurisdiction. The only remedies
available in such an action shall be:
(1) Back pay;
(2) Reimbursement of medical bills
directly related to a violation of this section;
and
(3) Additionally, if a protected person
proves, by clear and convincing evidence, that
the conduct of the employer was outrageous
because of the employer's evil motive or
reckless indifference to the rights of others,
then, such person may receive double the amount
awarded under subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection, as liquidated damages. In applying
this subdivision, the provisions of section
510.263 shall be applied as though liquidated
damages were punitive damages and as though the
100 amounts referenced in subdivisions (1) and (2)
101 of this subsection were compensatory damages.
102 8. The court, in addition to the damages
103 set forth in subsection 7 of this section, may
104 award the prevailing party court costs and
105 reasonable attorney fees; except that a

SB 1633 37
106 prevailing respondent may be awarded reasonable
107 attorney fees only upon a showing that the case
108 was without foundation.]
✓